District of Columbia statutes.
29-201.06

Nonexclusivity.

The fact that a transaction under this chapter produces a certain result shall not preclude the same result from being accomplished in any other manner permitted by law other than this chapter.

History

July 2, 2011, D.C. Law 18-378, § 2, 58 DCR 1720